District of Columbia statutes.
42-3404.37

Rules.

Within 60 days of December 24, 2008, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 437
as added Dec. 24, 2008, D.C. Law 17-286, § 2, 55 DCR 11989